Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 6. Remedies and General Provisions.

Sec. 21.36.900.
Procedures as to undefined practices.

If the director believes that a person engaged in the insurance business is engaging in this state in an unfair method of competition or in an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of the business that is not defined as being unfair or deceptive under this chapter, the director shall hold a hearing on the matter, if the director believes it would be in the public interest to do so after giving notice of the hearing and of the charges. Upon conclusion of the hearing the director shall make a written report of the findings of fact relative to the charges and serve a copy upon the person and any intervenor at the hearing.

If the report charges a violation of this chapter and if the method of competition, act, or practice has not been discontinued, the director may, through the attorney general of this state, at any time after the service of the report, cause an action to be instituted to enjoin and restrain the person from engaging in the method, act, or practice. In the action the court may grant a restraining order or injunction upon just terms, but the state may not be required to give security before the issuance of the order or injunction. If a record of the proceedings in the hearing before the director was made, a certified transcript, including all evidence taken and the report and findings, shall be received in evidence in the action.

If the director’s report made under (a) of this section, or order on hearing made under AS

21.36.910

does not charge a violation of this chapter, an intervenor in the proceedings may appeal from the order or report within the time and in the manner provided for appeals from the director generally.

In addition to the unfair methods and unfair or deceptive acts or practices expressly defined in this title, the director may adopt regulations to define other methods of competition and other acts and practices related to the business of insurance that are unfair or deceptive.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 14 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 141, 142 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.150

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time, in subsection (c), “AS

21.36.910

” was substituted for “AS

21.36.320

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.320

.

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For risk retention groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 1.

For purchasing groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 2.

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For coverage for attorney fees taxable as costs against an insured according to Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see 3 AAC 26, art. 3.

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 8.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

For schedule and individual risk rating plans, see 3 AAC 29, art. 5.

Sec. 21.36.910.
Hearings and order on violation.

On the complaint of a person or on the motion of the director, the director may conduct an investigation to determine whether a person is engaged in an unfair method of competition or unfair or deceptive act or practice prohibited by this chapter.

If there are grounds for believing that a person is engaged in an act or practice prohibited by this chapter, the director may institute proceedings under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

.

If the director determines that a person violated this chapter, the director shall serve upon the person charged an order requiring that person to cease and desist from engaging in the act or practice.

In addition to an order issued under (c) of this section, the director may, after a hearing, order restitution, assess a penalty of not more than $2,500 for each violation or $25,000 for engaging in a general business practice in violation of this chapter.

If the director determines after a hearing that the person charged knew or should have known that the person was in violation of this chapter, in addition to the penalty prescribed in (d) of this section, a suspension or revocation of the person’s license and a penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation or $250,000 for engaging in the general business practice in violation of this chapter may also be ordered by the director.

If the director believes that a person has violated a cease and desist order issued under (c) of this section, the director may certify the relevant facts to the superior court in the appropriate district, for proceedings under AS

44.62.590

. In addition to the penalties and remedies provided for in AS

44.62.590

, the superior court, upon finding that the cease and desist order has been violated, may order the violator to comply with the order, pay an additional penalty of not more than $1,000,000 for each violation, may revoke or suspend the violator’s license, and may bar the violator from transacting the business of insurance in the future.

In determining the penalty imposed under (d) and (e) of this section, the director shall consider the amount of loss or harm caused by the violation and the amount of benefit derived by the person by reason of the violation and may consider other factors, including the seriousness of the violation, the promptness and completeness of remedial action, whether the violation was a single act or a trade practice, and deterrence of the violator or others.

If the violation is a single act prohibited under AS

21.36.125

that results in loss or harm, the director may require restitution or issue a cease and desist order but may not impose a penalty that includes a fine or require other remedial action, unless the violation results in loss or harm and is intentional. This subsection does not affect the director’s authority to impose a penalty for multiple acts prohibited under AS

21.36.125

or a penalty for an act prohibited under a provision of law other than AS 21.36.125.

History.

(§ 8 ch 163 SLA 1976; am §§ 146 — 151 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 8, 9 ch 97 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.320

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Sec. 21.36.920.
Injunctive relief.

The director may seek injunctive relief to aid in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 163 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.330

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.930.
Provisions of this chapter additional to other law.

The powers vested in the director by this chapter are in addition to any other powers to enforce penalties, fines, or other forfeitures authorized by law with respect to acts and practices declared in this chapter to be unfair or deceptive.

History.

(§ 8 ch 163 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.340

.
Renumbered in 2010.